Oklahoma, session 2026, SB342.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.412 of Title 68, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For tax year 2026 and subsequent tax years, there shall be


allowed a credit against the tax imposed by Section 2355 of Title 68


of the Oklahoma Statutes for individual taxpayers who are employees


commuting at least two (2) miles each way to their workplace;


provided, the taxpayer shall be employed and assigned to the same


workplace and reside at his or her primary residence for the


entirety of the tax year.


B. The credit amount shall be calculated as follows: by


multiplying the number two hundred forty by the miles commuted each

Req. No. 1123 Page 1


day, not to exceed forty (40) miles, and by multiplying the


resulting product by the standard mileage rate for the applicable


tax year as prescribed by the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as


amended. The miles commuted shall equal the shortest driving


distance between the address of the primary residence of the


taxpayer and the address of the workplace.


C. If the credit allowed pursuant to this section exceeds the


tax imposed by Section 2355 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


the excess amount shall be refunded to the taxpayer.


D. The credit authorized pursuant to this section shall be


claimed on a form prescribed by the Oklahoma Tax Commission and


shall include the address of the workplace.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1123 QD 1/2/2025 10:41:49 PM



















Req. No. 1123 Page 2